Hawaii statutes.
[§486N-7.5] Military
personnel; federal active duty deployment outside State; cancellation or
suspension of contract. (a) In addition to cancellation of a health club
contract under sections 486N-6 and 486N-7, a health club contract of a member
of the United States military, including a member of the Hawaii National Guard,
United States military reserves, or regular United States armed forces who is
serving on federal active duty or active duty in federal service and deployed
or otherwise serving outside of this State during the term of the contract, may
be canceled or suspended; provided that the request for cancellation or
suspension:

(1) Is made by the member or the member's legally
designated representative;

(2) Includes a copy of the member's official military
orders or a written verification from the member's commanding officer; and

(3) Is made within ninety days after the member
receives notice of serving on federal active duty or active duty in federal
service and deployment or service outside of this State.

(b) If a contract is suspended under this
section, the health club shall not charge any fees to reinstate the contract
and shall maintain the original payment obligations set forth in the contract.
A contract that is suspended pursuant to this section shall be subject to
cancellation two years from the date of suspension if the buyer fails to
reinstate the contract.

(c) If a contract is canceled under this
section, the health club may retain the portion of the total contract price
representing the services used plus reimbursement for the expenses incurred in
an amount not to exceed twenty-five per cent of the total contract price. [L
2010, c 45, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next